Utah statutes.
78B-6-1229.   If tenant unknown.

If persons entitled to the estate for life or years are unknown, the court shall provide for the protection of their rights in the same manner as if they were known and had appeared.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

